Kansas, session 2025-2026, SB281.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. K.S.A. 75-650 is hereby amended to read as follows: 75-
650. (a) As used in this section:
(1) "Federal poverty level" means the most recent poverty income
guidelines published in the calendar year by the United States department
of health and human services.
(2) "Program" means the low-income family postsecondary savings
accounts incentive program established by this section.
(3) "Qualified individual or family" means an individual or family
who resides within the state of Kansas and whose household income is
positive and not more than 200% of the federal poverty level for the tax
year prior to the year in which the application is submitted.
(4) "Participant" means a qualified individual or family who has been
approved for a matching grant under the program.
(5) "District" means a congressional district of the state of Kansas.
(6) "Application" means an application for a matching grant under the
program.
(7) "Third-party contributor" means any individual or organization
who contributes money moneys to a family postsecondary savings account
established pursuant to K.S.A. 75-640 et seq., and amendments thereto,
other than the account owner who established such family postsecondary
savings account for the benefit of the participant.
(8) Words and phrases have the meanings provided by K.S.A. 75-643,
and amendments thereto, unless otherwise provided by this section.
(b) There is hereby established the low-income family postsecondary
savings accounts incentive program. The purpose of the program is to
encourage the establishment of family postsecondary savings accounts
pursuant to K.S.A. 75-640, and amendments thereto, by qualified

SB 281 2
individuals and families.
(c) The treasurer shall:
(1) Implement and administer the program;
(2) develop marketing plans and promotional material for the
program;
(3) prescribe the procedure for, and requirements relating to, the
submission and approval of applications;
(4) do all things necessary and proper to carry out the purposes of this
act; and
(5) adopt any rules and regulations and policies deemed necessary for
implementation and administration of the program.
(d) Applications shall be submitted to the treasurer in the manner and
form required by the treasurer. Applications shall be accompanied by any
information deemed necessary by the treasurer. Applications must shall be
submitted each year using the applicant's household income from the
previous tax year.
(e) Beginning in calendar year 2009In calendar years 2025, 2026
and 2027, the treasurer may approve no not more than 300 250
applications from a single district. If 300 250 applications from residents
of a district are not approved in each such calendar year 2009 or any year
thereafter, the treasurer may approve additional applications submitted by
residents of the remaining districts of up to the program total of 1,200
1,000 applications per year. Applications shall be approved on a first
come, first served basis. The treasurer shall provide written notice, to an
applicant, of the approval or nonapproval of such person's application. For
calendar year 2028, and each calendar year thereafter, the treasurer shall
not accept nor approve any application for the program.
(f) The amount of contributions made to an account by an account
owner who establishes a family postsecondary savings account for the
benefit of a participant pursuant to K.S.A. 75-640 et seq., and amendments
thereto, shall be matched by the state on a dollar-for-dollar basis if the
account owner contributes at least $100 to a family postsecondary
education savings account for the benefit of the participant during the
calendar year any of the calendar years 2025, 2026 and 2027 for which
the application has been approved. The aggregate of all matching amounts
for any family postsecondary savings account shall not exceed $600 in for
any calendar year. All contributions by a third-party contributor shall be
deposited in the matching grant account for the participant established by
the treasurer or another similar account for which the withdrawals are
restricted as required by subsection (h).
(g) Between January 1 and January 31 of each state fiscal year, the
director of accounts and reports shall transfer from the state general fund
to the Kansas postsecondary education savings program trust fund the

SB 281 3
amount, as certified by the treasurer, necessary to meet the matching
obligations under subsection (f) for the preceding calendar year, except
that the amount transferred from the state general fund to the Kansas
postsecondary education savings program trust fund shall not exceed the
maximum amount specified by appropriation act for such purpose for that
state fiscal year. On or before January 31 of each year, the treasurer shall
transfer from the Kansas postsecondary education savings program trust
fund to the account of each participant the amount determined by the
treasurer to meet the matching obligation due to such participant under
subsection (f) for the preceding calendar year.
(h) (1) The treasurer shall ensure that all withdrawals of matching
funds are used for qualified withdrawals under K.S.A. 75-640 et seq., and
amendments thereto.The treasurer shall not be required to prospectively
approve any withdrawals under the program. Withdrawals of matching
funds under the program shall be subject to audit as provided in this
subsection.
(2) The treasurer shall retrospectively audit at least 10 withdrawals
of matching funds under the program made during each of the calendar
years 2025, 2026 and 2027 to determine whether each such withdrawal
was a qualified withdrawal or a nonqualified withdrawal under K.S.A. 75-
640 et seq., and amendments thereto. The treasurer shall notify any
participant whose withdrawal was selected for audit and request such
participant to provide to the treasurer any documentation and information
deemed necessary by the treasurer to facilitate the audit and determine
whether the withdrawal was a qualified withdrawal or a nonqualified
withdrawal under K.S.A. 75-640 et seq., and amendments thereto. Such
documentation and information shall be submitted to the treasurer in the
manner and form required by the treasurer on or before a deadline
established by the treasurer and specified in the notice. If the participant
does not timely respond to the notice of the audit, the audited withdrawal
shall be conclusively presumed to be a nonqualified withdrawal. If the
participant does not timely respond to the notice of audit or the treasurer
otherwise determines that the audited withdrawal was a nonqualified
withdrawal, then the treasurer shall provide notice thereof to the Kansas
department of revenue or other appropriate taxing authorities as
determined by the treasurer and the participant.
(3) The treasurer's determination that a withdrawal is a nonqualified
withdrawal under K.S.A. 75-640 et seq., and amendments thereto, shall be
conclusive for the purposes of this act, absent manifest error.
(4) If the treasurer determines that the audited withdrawal was a
nonqualified withdrawal under K.S.A. 75-640 et seq., and amendments
thereto, then the participant shall refund the matching portion of the
withdrawal by paying such portion to the treasurer, on payment terms

SB 281 4
established by the treasurer. Any such amounts that remain due and
unpaid after the date prescribed by the treasurer for the payment thereof
shall be subject to interest at the rate of 5% per annum, compounded
monthly, from the date prescribed by the treasurer for the payment thereof.
To collect such refund and interest from the participant, the treasurer is
authorized to certify the amount due for setoff pursuant to K.S.A. 75-6201
et seq., and amendments thereto, and to exercise any other enforcement
right otherwise available to the treasurer. The refund requirement under
this act is in addition to and not in substitution for any other fine, penalty,
interest or other consequence otherwise imposed by law in connection
with withdrawals from the Kansas postsecondary education savings
program.
(i) The treasurer shall deposit all refunds and interest received under
subsection (h) in the state treasury to the credit of the state general fund.
(i)(j) The treasurer shall prepare and submit to the governor and the
legislature a report on the program on or before January 31 of each year
2026, 2027 and 2028. Such report shall include the number of accounts
opened under the program, the amount of moneys contributed to such
accounts by the participants, the amount of matching moneys transferred
by the treasurer pursuant to subsection (g), the average income of the
participants, an analysis of the success of the program in meeting the
purpose of the program the number and results of any audit performed
pursuant to subsection (h) and any other information deemed appropriate
by the treasurer.
(j)(k) The provisions of this section shall be a part of and
supplemental to the Kansas postsecondary education savings program.
Sec. 2. K.S.A. 75-650 is hereby repealed.
Sec. 3. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the Kansas register.